Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3406
Flesch reading ease score; lower score authorized; when.

The director may authorize a lower score than the Flesch reading ease score required in subsection (1) of section 44-3405 whenever, in his or her sole discretion, he or she finds that a lower score: (1) Will provide a more accurate reflection of the readability of a policy form; (2) is warranted by the nature of a particular policy form or type or class of policy forms; or (3) is caused by certain policy language which is drafted to conform to the requirements of any state law, regulation, or agency interpretation.

Laws 1979, LB 415, § 6.